Washington statutes.
RCW 3.66.050

Transfer of proceedings.

If a civil action is brought in the wrong district, the action may nevertheless be tried therein unless the defendant, at the time the defendant appears, requests a transfer of the action to the proper district. Upon such demand an order shall be entered transferring the action to the proper district and awarding the defendant a reasonable attorney's fee to be paid by the plaintiff.

[ 1984 c 258 s 43; 1961 c 299 s 116.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.